Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5240
Eligible employee, defined.

Eligible employee shall mean an employee who works on a full-time basis and has a normal workweek of thirty or more hours. The term shall include a sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership, a member of a limited liability company, and an independent contractor, if the sole proprietor, partner, member, or independent contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer, but shall not include an employee who works on a part-time, temporary, or substitute basis.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 18.